Montana, session 2025, HB790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Coordination with department of justice -- fingerprinting -- criminal
history of department employees. (1) The department may contact and request information from the
department of justice, which is designated as a criminal justice agency within the meaning of 44-5-103, for the
purpose of obtaining criminal history record information regarding the department's employees for compliance
with federal requirements for access to federal taxpayer information.
(2) (a) The department shall require any employee with access to federal taxpayer information as a
part of their employment to submit a full set of fingerprints for the purpose of fingerprint checks by the Montana
department of justice and the federal bureau of investigation.
(b) The employee shall sign a release of information to the department.
(c) After completion of the criminal record background check, the department of justice shall
forward all criminal history record information, as defined in 44-5-103, in any jurisdiction to the department as
authorized in 44-5-303.
(d) The department is responsible to the department of justice for the payment of all fees
associated with the employee's criminal record background report.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 15, chapter 1, part 1, and the provisions of Title 15, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 1].

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 790

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 790.1
NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 790